Utah statutes.
59-10-1004.   Tax credit for cash contributions to sheltered workshops.
(1)  For tax years beginning January 1, 1983, and thereafter, in computing the
tax due the state under Section 59-10-104 there shall be a nonrefundable tax
credit allowed for cash contributions made by a claimant, estate, or trust
within the taxable year to nonprofit rehabilitation sheltered workshop
facilities for persons with a disability operating in Utah that are certified
by the Department of Human Services as a qualifying facility.
(2)  The allowable tax credit is an amount equal to 50% of the aggregate
amount of the cash contributions to the qualifying rehabilitation facilities,
but the allowed tax credit may not exceed $200.
(3)  The amount of contribution claimed as a tax credit under this section may
not also be claimed as a charitable deduction in determining net taxable
income.
